Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 7. Board Procedures.

Sec. 04.11.510.
Procedure for action on license applications, suspensions, and revocations.

Unless a legal action relating to the license, applicant, or premises to be licensed is pending, the board shall decide whether to grant or deny an application within 90 days of receipt of the application at the main office of the board. However, the decision may not be made before the time allowed for protest under AS

04.11.480

has elapsed, unless waived by the municipality.

The board may review an application for the issuance, renewal, transfer of location, or transfer to another person of a license without affording the applicant notice or hearing, except

if an application is denied, the notice of denial shall be furnished the applicant immediately in writing stating the reason for the denial in clear and concise language; the notice of denial must inform the applicant that the applicant is entitled to an informal conference with either the director or the board, and that, if not satisfied by the informal conference, the applicant is then entitled to a formal hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

); if the applicant requests a formal hearing, the office of administrative hearings shall adhere to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act); all interested persons may be heard at the hearing and unless waived by the applicant and the board, the formal hearing shall be held in the area for which the application is requested;

the board may, on its own initiative or in response to an objection or protest, hold a hearing to ascertain the reaction of the public or a local governing body to an application if a hearing is not required under this subsection; the board shall send notice of a hearing conducted under this paragraph 20 days in advance of the hearing to each community council established within the municipality and to each nonprofit community organization entitled to notification under AS

04.11.310(b)

;

if a petition containing the signatures of 35 percent of the adult residents having a permanent place of abode outside of but within two miles of an incorporated city or an established village is filed with the board, the board shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the license in the city or village would be in the public interest;

if a protest to the issuance, renewal, transfer of location or transfer to another person of a license made by a local governing body is based on a question of law, the board shall hold a public hearing.

Unless the grounds for the suspension or revocation are under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

, board proceedings to suspend or revoke a license shall be conducted in accordance with AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act), except that the licensee is entitled to an opportunity to informally confer with the director or the board within 10 days after the accusation is served upon the licensee. Notice of the opportunity for an informal conference shall be served upon the licensee along with the accusation. If an informal conference is requested, the running of the period of time specified in AS

44.62.380

for filing a notice of defense is tolled from the date of receipt of the request for the conference until the day following the date of the conference unless extended by the board. After the conference, the licensee, if not satisfied by the results of the conference, may obtain a hearing by filing a notice of defense as provided in AS

44.62.390

. If the grounds for suspension or revocation are under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

, the licensee is not entitled to notice and hearing under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

on the merits of the suspension or revocation. However, the board shall afford the licensee notice and hearing on the issue of what administrative sanction to impose under AS

04.16.180

.

[Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1988; am § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For hearings as a result of a protest under this section, see AS

04.11.480

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.510.
Procedure for action on license applications, suspensions, and revocations.

Unless a legal action relating to the license, applicant, or premises to be licensed is pending, the board shall decide whether to grant or deny an application within 90 days of receipt of the application at the main office of the board. However, the decision may not be made before the time allowed for protest under AS

04.11.480

has elapsed, unless waived by the municipality.

The board may review an application for the issuance, renewal, transfer of location, or transfer to another person of a license without affording the applicant notice or hearing, except

if an application is denied, written notice of denial shall be furnished immediately to the applicant stating the reason for the denial in clear and concise language; the notice of denial must inform the applicant that the applicant is entitled to submit a request to the director, within 15 days after receiving the notice of denial, for an informal conference with either the director or the board, and that, if not satisfied by the informal conference, the applicant is then entitled to a formal hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

); the director shall respond to a request for an informal conference or a formal hearing in a timely manner and shall hold an informal conference within 15 days after receiving a request for an informal conference unless the applicant and the director agree in writing to waive or extend the time limit; if the applicant requests an informal conference, the running of the period for requesting a formal hearing is tolled from the date the director receives the request for the conference until the day after the date of the conference; if the applicant requests a formal hearing, the office of administrative hearings shall adhere to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act); all interested persons may be heard at the hearing;

the board may, on its own initiative or in response to an objection or protest, hold a hearing to ascertain the reaction of the public or a local governing body to an application if a hearing is not required under this subsection; the board shall send notice of a hearing conducted under this paragraph 20 days in advance of the hearing to the person who filed the objection or protest, to a community council, if the licensed premises or proposed licensed premises described in the application is located within the boundaries of the community council, and to each nonprofit community organization entitled to notification under AS

04.11.310(b)

;

if a petition containing the signatures of 35 percent of the adult residents having a permanent place of abode outside of but within two miles of an incorporated city or an established village is filed with the board, the board shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the license in the city or village would be in the public interest;

if a protest to the issuance, renewal, transfer of location or transfer to another person of a license made by a local governing body is based on a question of law, the board shall hold a public hearing.

Unless the grounds for the suspension or revocation are under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

, board proceedings to suspend or revoke a license shall be conducted in accordance with AS

44.62.360

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act), except that the licensee may submit a request to the director within 15 days after the accusation is served on the licensee for an opportunity to informally confer with the director or the board. Notice of the opportunity for an informal conference shall be served on the licensee along with the accusation. The director shall respond to a request for an informal conference or a formal hearing in a timely manner. The director shall hold an informal conference within 15 days after receiving a request for an informal conference unless the applicant and the director agree in writing to waive or extend the time limit. After the informal conference, the board shall hold a formal hearing on the accusation at the next regularly scheduled board meeting that occurs 20 days or more after service of the accusation. If the grounds for suspension or revocation are under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

, the licensee is not entitled to notice and hearing under AS

44.62.360

—

44.62.630

on the merits of the suspension or revocation. However, the board shall afford the licensee notice and hearing on the issue of what administrative sanction to impose under AS

04.16.180

.

[Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 1988; am § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 163 SLA 2004; am §§ 73, 74 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.520.
Notice to local governing body.

After receipt of an application from within (1) an established village, (2) an incorporated city, (3) an organized borough, or (4) a unified municipality, the board shall transmit written notice to the local governing body within 10 days so that the local governing body may protest under AS

04.11.480

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.520.
Notice to local governing body.

After receipt of an application for the issuance or renewal of a license, the renewal of a license with one or more endorsements, the transfer of a license or a license with one or more endorsements to another person, the transfer of a license to a new location, or the issuance of an endorsement from within an established village, an incorporated city, an organized borough, or a unified municipality, the board shall notify the local governing body in writing within 10 business days so that the local governing body may protest under AS

04.11.480

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 75 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.525.
Notice to community council and others.

On receipt of an application for the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer of the ownership of a license, the board shall provide written notice under AS

04.11.310(b)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 100 SLA 1988)

Sec. 04.11.530.
Consideration of reports.

A license may not be suspended or revoked under AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

or (5) unless the board considers the reports prepared by arresting and investigating officers and the sentencing report sent to the board under AS

12.55.025(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.535.
Suspension and revocation based on acts of employees.

If, in a proceeding to suspend or revoke a license under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

, the board finds that a sentencing report sent to the board under AS

12.55.025(b)

or a report prepared by the investigating or arresting officers in connection with the violation, contains information that if uncontradicted or unexplained would provide a ground for suspension or revocation under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

, the licensee has the burden of proof to establish that the licensee neither knowingly allowed the violation nor recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

.

If the board suspends or revokes a license on grounds that a licensee knowingly allowed or recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

resulting in unlawful action of an agent or employee, the board shall file a criminal complaint charging the licensee with violation of AS

04.16.150

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.535.
Suspension and revocation based on acts of employees.

If, in a proceeding to suspend or revoke a license, endorsement, or permit under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

, the board finds that a sentencing report, record of conviction, or judgment sent to the board under AS

12.55.025(b)

or a report prepared by the investigating or arresting officers in connection with the violation, contains information that if uncontradicted or unexplained would provide a ground for suspension or revocation under AS

04.11.370(a)(5)

, the licensee or permittee has the burden of proof to establish that the licensee or permittee neither knowingly allowed the violation nor recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

.

If the board suspends or revokes a license on grounds that a licensee knowingly allowed or recklessly or with criminal negligence failed to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

resulting in unlawful action of an agent or employee, the board shall file a criminal complaint charging the licensee with violation of AS

04.16.150

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 76 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.537.
Application of precedent.

History.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 38 SLA 2018.]